Massachusetts, session 194th, H2985.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law or rule or regulation to the
contrary regulating the maximum age of applicants for appointment as firefighter, Stephen
Justice of the City of Haverhill, shall be eligible for appointment to the position of firefighter in
the City if he meets all other requirements, in which case he shall be eligible for certification and
appointment to the fire department of the City of Haverhill.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1